Nebraska, session 109, LB774.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB774 LB774
2026 2026
Section 1. (1)(a) The Rural Health Transformation Program Fund is
created. The fund shall be administered by the Department of Health and
Human Services and shall consist of money received from the federal
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the Rural Health
Transformation Program. Money in the fund shall be used to support
communities in transforming health care delivery systems and improving
access to health care and health outcomes.
(b) Any money in the Rural Health Transformation Program Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The department shall electronically report to the Legislature on
or before December 15 of each year regarding the use of the fund and the
outcomes achieved from the use of the fund.
-2-